Alabama, session 2026rs, HB113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) FAULTY CONDITION. A condition that:
a. Significantly impairs the use, value, or safety of a
firearm; and
b. Occurs or arises in the course of the ordinary use
of the firearm and not as a result of abuse, neglect,
modification, or alteration of the firearm not authorized by
the manufacturer, nor from any accident or other damage to the
Page 1

the manufacturer, nor from any accident or other damage to the
HB113 INTRODUCED
firearm which occurs or arises after the firearm is delivered
by a licensed firearm dealer to a consumer.
(2) FIREARM. Has the same meaning as provided in
Section 13A-8-1, Code of Alabama 1975.
(3) LICENSED FIREARM DEALER. A person who possesses a
federal firearms license pursuant to 18 U.S.C. § 923 to sell
firearms to consumers in this state.
(b)(1) A licensed firearm dealer shall accept from a
consumer, not more than three days after being sold, the
return of a firearm with a faulty condition that the licensed
firearm dealer sold to the consumer in exchange for another
firearm of the same make and model, if available.
(2) A consumer shall provide video proof of the faulty
condition to the dealer at the time of return if the faulty
condition may not be safely demonstrated or otherwise shown in
the dealer's place of business.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2